Maine, session 132, LD1471.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §6030-C, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Failure to provide energy efficiency disclosure statement. Beginning January 1,
2030, a tenant under subsection 2 who does not receive a signed energy efficiency
disclosure statement as required by this section may terminate the tenant’s lease by
providing the landlord a 30-day written notice. Except as provided in section 6033, a
landlord may not retain any fee, any security deposit or a portion of a security deposit for
a lease or tenancy at will terminated as a result of a failure to provide a signed energy
efficiency disclosure statement in accordance with this section.
Page 1 - 132LR1021(03)